Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 15 Challenging

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 381 to 443.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 401 to 539.

§ 22-15-101.
Right to vote may be challenged.

Registration is evidence of a person’s right to vote at any election, but this right may be challenged at the polls in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-215.

When person offering to vote at an election is challenged,

he is required to take the prescribed oath that he is a qualified voter and also to deliver to the judges of election an affidavit of two qualified electors of that precinct stating that the person offering to vote is qualified. Pratley v. State, 17 Wyo. 371, 99 P. 1116,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1909).

§§ 22-15-102 and 22-15-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided for the certification of qualified challengers and restrictions on challengers.

§ 22-15-104.
Grounds for challenge.

A person offering to vote may be challenged for the following reasons:

Not a qualified elector;

Not entitled to vote in the precinct;

Name does not appear on poll list and the person cannot meet the requirements to register at the polls;

Not the person he represents himself to be;

Has already voted;

For in person voting, failure to present acceptable identification immediately before voting at the polling place or absentee polling place.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-218; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2021 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iii), substituted “poll list and the person cannot meet the requirements to register at the polls” for “registry of electors.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-15-105.
Challenged person may vote; generally.

If a person offering to vote is challenged, and the challenge is not resolved in accordance with W.S.

22-15-106

, an election judge shall offer the voter a ballot clearly marked “provisional” and which cannot be automatically tabulated.

A person challenged on any ground may vote by provisional ballot, if he subscribes this oath in writing before a judge of election:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am the person I represent myself to be and that I am a qualified elector entitled to vote in this precinct at this election and that this is the only ballot I have or will vote in this election.”.

Signature of voter Signature of judge Precinct and District No.

Click to view

The oath required by this section shall be printed on the provisional ballot envelope.

A challenged voter may present information and documentation of his eligibility to register at the election or to vote to the county clerk until the close of business on the day following the election. Any information presented shall be considered by the canvassing board in determining the voter’s eligibility to register at the election or to vote and whether to open and count his provisional ballot. The provisional ballot shall be counted only after the voter has, by presenting documentation required under this code to the county clerk, established he had previously registered and is a qualified elector or he was eligible to register at the election and is a qualified elector.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-219; Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2004, ch. 94, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), deleted “except not being registered to vote” following “A person challenged on any ground”; and rewrote (d) to allow a challenged voter to have a provisional ballot counted only after presenting documentation of his eligibility to register.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

§ 22-15-106.
Where name not on poll list.

A person challenged on the ground that his name does not appear on the poll list may vote if a judge of election obtains verification from the county clerk that the person is entitled to vote in that election within that county.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-220; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “poll list” for “registry list.”

§ 22-15-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to pollbook requirements for challenged voters.

§ 22-15-108.
Duty of judges to challenge.

It is the duty of the judges to challenge electors whenever existence of legal grounds for doing so is known or apparent to the judges.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-222.

§ 22-15-109.
Poll watchers; certification; qualification; authority; removal.

The county chairman of each political party may certify poll watchers prior to the day of the election to serve in each polling place. Not more than one (1) poll watcher from each political party may serve simultaneously unless the chief judge determines that one (1) additional poll watcher from each political party may be accommodated in the polling place without disrupting the polling process.

A poll watcher shall belong to the political party he represents and shall be a registered elector residing in the county. A poll watcher shall serve only at the polling place designated on the certificate. A poll watcher is authorized to observe voter turn out and registration and may make written memoranda but shall not challenge voters, conduct electioneering activities or disrupt the polling process.

The chief judge may remove a poll watcher from the polling place for disturbing the polling place, or for any other violation of the Election Code.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct” in the first sentence in
(a) and (b); and substituted “polling
place” for “polling premises” in the second sentence in (a) and in (c).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.